Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB787.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.200 is amended to read as follows:
Each branch of government shall have its budget recommendations printed in such
number of copies thereof as to ensure[insure] that each member of the General Assembly
and the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate have individual copies.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed